Alabama, session 2026rs, HB578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) CONSERVATION EASEMENT. The same meaning as provided
in Section 35-18-1, Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) CONSERVATION EASEMENT HOLDER. A charitable
corporation, charitable association, or charitable trust, the
purposes or powers of which include retaining or protecting
the natural, scenic, or open-space values of real property;
assuring the availability of real property for agricultural,
silvicultural, forest, recreational, or open-space use;
protecting natural resources, maintaining, or enhancing air or
water quality; or preserving the historical, architectural,
archaeological, paleontological, or cultural aspects of real
property.
(b) Any board of water and sewer commissioners
established and organized under Act 775 of the 1951 Regular
Page 1

established and organized under Act 775 of the 1951 Regular
HB578 INTRODUCED
Session (Acts 1951, pg. 1359), or successor entity, that owns
one or more of the following real property parcels within
Mobile County, not later than October 1, 2027, shall convey a
conservation easement for each parcel to a conservation
easement holder:
1607250000006.000; 1607250000006.01; 1607360000001.000;
1709310000003.002; 1709310000003.001; 1709300000005.000;
1709310000003.000; 1709310000003.004; 2403060000003.000;
2403070002061.002; 2403070002064.001; 2403060000001.003;
2403060000004.000; 2403060000001.012; 2403060000003.01;
2403060000002.000; 2403070002061.001; 2403070001001.000;
2501010000001.000; 2501010000006.000; 2501010000007.000;
2501120000002.000; 2501120000008.000; 2501122000001.000;
2501010000008.000; 2501013000004.000; 2501013000008.000;
2501013000009.000; 2501120000001.000; 2501122000002.000;
2501110000001.000; 2501120000007.000; 2501120000007.01;
2501120000009.000; 2501120000009.001; 2501120000009.01;
2506140000001.001; 2506140000001.01; 2506140000001.000;
2506130000001.000; 2505150000025.000; 2506130000001.01;
2404180000022.000; 2404170002023.000; 2404170002023.01;
2404190000004.000; 2408330000049.000; 2409310000004.002;
2506230000001.000; 2506230000002.000; 2506230000003.000;
2506230000014.000; 2506240000007.000; 2506240000007.01;
2507250000020.000; 2507260000001.000; 2507260000004.000;
2507260000007.01; 2507350000001.000; 2507350000014.000;
2507360000003.000; 2507360000004.000; 2507360000005.003;
2507360000006.000; 2507360000007.000; 2507360000008.000;
2507360000009.000; 2601010000002.000; 2601010000003.000;
Page 2

2507360000009.000; 2601010000002.000; 2601010000003.000;
HB578 INTRODUCED
2601020000001.000; 2601020000001.01; 2505220000001.000;
2506240000008.000; 2507250000003.000; 2507250000004.000;
2507360000001.000; 2507360000002.000; 2508340000001.000;
2506240000021.001; 2506230000016.000; 2507250000022.000;
2507250000023.000; 2409320000009.000; 2409320000009.001;
2507260000003.000; 2508270000002.003; 2507260000002.000;
2506240000025.000; 2507250000015.000; 2507250000019.000;
2507250000021.000; 2506240000001.000; 2507260000007.000;
2409310000010.000; 2507350000003.000; 2507350000003.001;
2507350000003.002; 2507350000015.000; 2507360000005.002;
2507360000010.000; 2601010000004.000; 2409310000010.009;
2505220000053.000; 2507260000005.000; 2508270000001.000;
2507260000002.01; 2506240000022.000; 2702040000007.000;
2601010000005.000; 2601020000001.02; 2601020000009.001;
2606130000002.000; 2703050000001.001; 2601010000006.000;
2601010000008.000; 2601020000009.002; 2601010000007.000;
2601110000004.000; 2601120000001.000; 2702030000074.000;
2702030000076.000; 2702030000078.000; 2703050000001.01;
2703050000001.02; 2703050000001.03; 2703060000001.01;
2703060000001.02; 2703080000019.000; 2703060000001.000;
2703060000001.03; 2703060000002.000; 2703080000020.000;
270350000001.000; 2702040000010.000; 2703080000001.000;
2703070000001.000; 2703070000006.003; 2703070000006.006;
2704180000008.000; 2507250000018.000; 2601010000001.000;
2403060000001.000; 2506230000004.000; 1709310000002.000;
1709300000014.000; 2409300000085.001; 2404200000006.005;
2404200000006.006; 2703070000006.012; 1606240000002.000; and
2409300000085.000, less and except the northwest quarter of
Page 3

2409300000085.000, less and except the northwest quarter of
HB578 INTRODUCED
the northwest quarter of section 30 township 3 south range 3
west, and any part lying within the existing Howell's Ferry
Road right of way.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
exempt any board of water and sewer commissioners or any other
party from any law that would otherwise apply to the
conveyance of a conservation easement.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4